District of Columbia statutes.
20-703

Preferences; sale of estate property.

Any interested person may move the Court to have a priority placed on the sale or transfer of any property of the estate, both real and personal, prior to the sale or transfer of that property. Upon the filing of such a motion, no sale or transfer of such estate property shall be undertaken by the personal representative until (1) all interested persons have been given notice by the personal representative of the motion; and (2) the Court, after a hearing, has determined the order in which certain property in the estate shall be sold or transferred.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

Section References

This section is referenced in § 20-106.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-703.